Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-702
Joint airport authority; agreement; governed by a board.

Any political subdivision otherwise authorized by law to own or operate an airport is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement with any other municipality or combination of municipalities pursuant to the provisions of the Interlocal Cooperation Act, with respect to the creation of a joint airport authority of the political subdivisions concerned. Such joint authority shall be governed by a five-member board having full and exclusive jurisdiction and control over all facilities specified in such agreement, whether then in existence or to be thereafter acquired, and having to do with aviation, air navigation, and air safety.

Laws 1969, c. 24, § 2, p. 203.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.